Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2306.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 103 of the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Accessibility code." Any collective codes relating to 12345678910111213141516171819202122 accessibility and their referenced standards.* * *"Updated accessibility code sections." Any sections of the newest editions of the ICC accessibility codes subject to review by the advisory board under section 106(d) that are different from, added to or deleted from the immediately preceding editions of the ICC codes.* * *Section 2. Section 106(a)(1) of the act is amended, the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 106. Accessibility Advisory Board.(a) Creation and composition.--(1) There is hereby created an Accessibility Advisory Board which shall be composed of 11 members, seven of which shall be appointed by the secretary. At least six members of the advisory board shall be public members, three of whom shall be persons with physical disabilities, one shall be an architect registered in Pennsylvania, one shall be a member of the business community, and one shall be a representative of the multifamily housing industry. One member shall be a municipal official. The chairman and minority chairman of the [Labor and Industry Committee of the Senate and the chairman and minority chairman of the Labor Relations Committee of the House of Representatives,] standing committees of the Senate and the House of Representatives having jurisdiction under the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act, to review Uniform Construction Code regulations, or their designees, shall be members. All members of the advisory board, except the members of the 20260HB2306PN3039 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 General Assembly, shall serve for a term of [two] four years and until their successors are appointed.* * *(5) Any member absent from three consecutive voting meetings may be dismissed and the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the appointment of the absent member, unless the secretary, upon written request from the member, finds the member should be excused from a meeting because of illness, the death of a family member, military service or another legitimate reason acceptable to the secretary.* * *(d) Review of accessibility code.--The advisory board shall review the accessibility code and submit a report to the secretary with sections of the accessibility code that are specified for adoption or modification. The review process shall be conducted as follows:(1) The advisory board shall commence review of the updated accessibility code sections 21 months following the publication of a new edition of the ICC codes, beginning with the 2024 ICC codes.(2) Each updated accessibility code section subject to review shall be examined by applying all of the following criteria:(i) The impact that the section may have upon the health, safety and welfare of the public, particularly individuals with disabilities.(ii) The economic and financial impact of the section, including the impact on the end consumer.(iii) The technical feasibility of the section.(3) The advisory board shall review the updated 20260HB2306PN3039 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accessibility code sections as follows:(i) A 120-day period to receive comments from the general public shall commence within 30 days of the advisory board's review under paragraph (1). The department shall transmit notice of the initiation of the public comment period to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and shall post notice on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(ii) All public comments shall be submitted on a form created by the advisory board. Each comment shall relate to a single updated accessibility code section. The comment shall, at a minimum, specify the updated accessibility code section to which the comment relates, state whether the updated section shall be adopted, rejected or modified and specify the rationale for the recommended action based on the criteria specified in paragraph (2). A proposed modification shall meet or exceed the standards of the section in effect or being reviewed and the proposed modification shall be within the standards under review.(iii) All public comments submitted in accordance with subparagraph (ii) shall be published in accordance with subparagraph (i).(iv) After the conclusion of the public comment period specified in subparagraph (i), the advisory board shall hold one or more in-person or virtual public hearings to receive additional public comment.(v) The advisory board shall hold one or more official meetings to decide whether to adopt, reject or 20260HB2306PN3039 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 modify the updated accessibility code sections in accordance with the following:(A) Updated accessibility code sections that did not receive public comment to reject or modify shall be adopted by a majority vote of advisory board members. The advisory board may consider updated accessibility code sections in a single vote.(B) Updated accessibility code sections that received public comment to reject or modify shall be voted on individually and shall require a vote of at least seven advisory board members for adoption or modification.(vi) The advisory board shall submit a report to the secretary within 24 months of the commencement of the review process by the advisory board with sections of the updated accessibility codes that are specified for adoption or modification.Section 3. Sections 301(a)(4), 304(a)(3) and (a.1) and 703(b), (c) and (d)(2) of the act are amended to read:Section 301. Adoption by regulations.(a) Regulations.--* * *(4) The secretary shall consider the recommendations of the advisory board as provided in section 106(c). [The department shall consider the comments of the advisory board with respect to accessibility issues in any proposed regulations.]* * *Section 304. Revised or successor codes.(a) Duties of department.--20260HB2306PN3039 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(3) [The department shall promulgate regulations updating accessibility standards under Chapter 3 by adopting by December 31 of the year of issuance of the accessibility provisions of the most recently published edition of the ICC codes and any other accessibility requirements which shall be specified in the regulations, or contained in or referenced by the Uniform Construction Code relating to persons with disabilities.] Within nine months of the report under section 106(d)(3)(vi), the department shall promulgate final-omitted regulations under the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act, to adopt the advisory board's decisions contained in the report without change. The regulations shall take effect 33 months after the commencement of the advisory board review as provided in section 106(d)(1).* * *(a.1) Continuity.--If an updated section is not adopted or modified under section 106 or 108, the relevant provisions of the existing sections shall remain in effect.* * *Section 703. Education and training programs.* * *(b) Accounts.--There are hereby established within the State Treasury [three] four restricted accounts which shall be known as the Municipal Code Official Training Account, the Review and Advisory Council Administration Account, the Accessibility Advisory Board Administration Account and the Construction Contractor Training Account.(c) Deposit.--20260HB2306PN3039 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The fee collected as authorized under subsection (a) shall be transmitted quarterly to the State Treasury and shall be divided and deposited in the accounts established in subsection (b) as follows:(i) Forty-three and one-half percent of the fee shall be deposited in the Municipal Code Official Training Account for the purpose of education and training programs for municipal code officials and individuals employed by third-party agencies under contract with a municipality.(ii) Forty-three and one-half percent of the fee shall be deposited in the Construction Contractor Training Account for a Pennsylvania-based housing research center located at a land grant university for the construction industry. To assure the programs meet the needs of the construction industry, the education, training and other activities provided by the housing research center must be approved by its industry advisory committee.(iii) [Thirteen] Ten percent of the fee shall be deposited in the Review and Advisory Council Administration Account for expenses of the council as authorized under section 107(l), for technical assistance as provided for under section 107(k), for administrative assistance as provided under section 107(j), for fees associated with the ICC to establish and publish code manuals which contain the standards of the Uniform Construction Code as provided under section 304(a)(4) and as otherwise determined necessary by the department as funds are available.20260HB2306PN3039 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) Three percent of the fee shall be deposited in the Accessibility Advisory Board Administration Account for expenses of the advisory board and department incurred under section 106(d) related to review of accessibility codes.(2) Money deposited under paragraph (1)(i) and (ii) is hereby appropriated on approval of the Governor to the Department of Community and Economic Development. The Department of Community and Economic Development may utilize up to 3% of the funds allocated to the account under paragraph (1)(i) and up to 3% of the funds allocated to the account under paragraph (1)(ii) for administrative and program expenses. Notwithstanding any other provision of this paragraph to the contrary, the Department of Community and Economic Development may continue to abide by the provisions of an agreement permitting the retention or collection of a greater percentage for administrative and program expenses, but only for a period of one year from the effective date of this paragraph.(3) All money deposited under paragraph (1)(iii) and (iv) shall be transmitted quarterly to the department. The department shall not be required to utilize other sources of funding to carry out activities under this act if the funds provided under this section are insufficient.(d) Reports.--* * *(2) No later than November 1 of each calendar year, the department shall provide a report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the [Labor and Industry Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of 20260HB2306PN3039 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Labor and Industry Committee of the House of Representatives.] standing committees of the Senate and the House of Representatives having jurisdiction under the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act, to review Uniform Construction Code regulations. The report shall detail expenditures for the most recent fiscal year. The report shall include:(i) A separate accounting of revenue and expenditures for the account under subsection (c)(1)(iii) and (iv). The separate accounting provided under this paragraph shall include, to the extent available, revenue and expenditures by a contractor, vendor or other party engaged to perform the services under subsection (c)(1)(iii) and (iv). All contracts entered into after the effective date of this paragraph by the department with a contractor, vendor or other party shall require the contractor, vendor or other party to provide the information required under this paragraph.(ii) The amount utilized by the Uniform Construction Code Review and Advisory Council and advisory board for reimbursement of travel expenses.(iii) The amount utilized by the Uniform Construction Code Review and Advisory Council and advisory board for other purposes and a description of each expenditure.(iv) The amount utilized by the department for personnel, including the position title, hours charged, amount and description of the duties and responsibilities of each individual paid in whole or in part from the account.20260HB2306PN3039 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) The amount utilized by the department for operational costs and a description of each expenditure.(vi) The amount utilized by the department for other program purposes and a description of each expenditure.Section 4. All regulations are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with this act.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2306PN3039 - 10 - 1234567